Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 270.140 is amended to read:
270.140. (1) If the provisions of ORS 270.100, 270.110 and  270.130 have been complied with as to
property administered by  it and no satisfactory proposal has been received, [ the state agency may,
at any time during a period of 18 months after the advertised date of  sale, sell such property in such
manner as it considers appropriate, ] a state  agency acting for the state in the sale of real
property or an equitable interest in real property that the state  owns may, beginning at any
time no later than 18 months after completing the process  of giving notice under ORS
270.130, offer for sale the real property or equitable interest  in any manner that the state
agency considers appropriate, including such commercially reasonable means as through  a real
estate licensee as set forth in ORS 696.007.
(2) If efforts by a state agency to sell real property  or an equitable interest pursuant to
subsection (1) of this  section have been discontinued for a period of 12 months or more, the
state agency may not resume offering the real property or  equitable interest for sale pur-
suant to subsection (1) of this section without first complying with the provisions of ORS
270.100, 270.110 and 270.130.
(3) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may  adopt rules necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2333 (HB 2333-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House May 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 23, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2333 (HB 2333-INTRO) Page 2